North Carolina, session 2025, HB740.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. DISASTER FOCUSED CONSTITUENT PORTAL
SECTION 1.1. The Department of Information Technology shall issue a request for
proposals for the development and creation of a disaster relief portal, focused on constituent
engagement, that will operate as a central platform for relevant updates and constituent services
in response to natural disasters occurring in the State. The disaster focused constituent
engagement portal shall be designed to consolidate critical information and programs from all
relevant State agency websites into a single, centralized portal where affected citizens can engage
with State agencies, find resources, and receive real-time information.
SECTION 1.2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Information Technology the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for the purposes described in this Part.
SECTION 1.3. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART II. CONTRACTOR LIABILITY LIMITS/STATE CONTRACTS
SECTION 2.1. Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143-49.2. Contractor liability in State contracts.
(a) All contracts subject to the provisions of this Article and Article 8 of this Chapter
shall include a limitation on the contractor's liability to the State for damages. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the limitation of liability shall be for damages arising from any cause
whatsoever, regardless of the form of action. The amount of liability shall be determined based
on the nature of the goods, services, or construction work covered by the contract; however, there
shall be a presumptive limitation of no more than two times the value of the contract. Limitation
of liability pursuant to this section shall specifically include, but not be limited to, the contractor's
liability for damages. The amount of liability for damages may be raised to no more than three
times the value of the contract if all of the following apply:
*H740-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The Secretary or the Secretary's designee completes a risk assessment prior to
the bid solicitation or request for proposals that determines an increase in the
liability amount is necessary to protect the State's best interests.
(2) The bid solicitation or request for proposals indicates that increased liability
will be required for the resulting contract.
(b) Prior to entering into any contract subject to the provisions of this Article or Article
8 of this Chapter, the Secretary or the Secretary's designee shall reasonably determine that the
contractor possesses sufficient financial resources, either independently or through third-party
sources, such as insurance, to satisfy the agreed upon limitation of liability. The limitation of
liability required by this section shall not apply to liability of the contractor for intentional or
willful misconduct, damage to tangible personal property, or physical injuries to persons.
Nothing in this subsection limits the contractor's liability directly to third parties or affects the
rights and obligations related to contribution among joint tortfeasors established by Chapter 1B
of the General Statutes and other applicable law.
(c) Not later than March 1 of each year, the Secretary shall report annually to the Joint
Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on General Government regarding the contracts containing liability amounts of more
than two times the value of the contract."
SECTION 2.2. This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies to contracts
awarded, renewed, or amended on or after that date.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 740-First Edition